test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vilt_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - viļț: # Noun 132 'eng /est vilt/fin' - full paradigm
     viļț+N+Sg+Nom: viļț
     viļț+N+Sg+Gen: viļț
     viļț+N+Sg+Par: viļțõ
     viļț+N+Sg+Dat: viļțõn
     viļț+N+Sg+Ins: viļțõks
     viļț+N+Sg+Ill: viļțõ
     viļț+N+Sg+Ela: viļțštõ
     viļț+N+Pl+Nom: viļțõd
     viļț+N+Pl+Gen: viļțõd
     viļț+N+Pl+Par: viļțidi
     viļț+N+Pl+Dat: viļțõdõn
     viļț+N+Pl+Ins: viļțõdõks
     viļț+N+Pl+Ill: viļțiž
     viļț+N+Pl+Ela: viļțist
